Utah statutes.
32B-9-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Single event permit" means an event permit issued in accordance with Part 3, Single Event Permit.

(2)  "Temporary beer event permit" means an event permit issued in accordance with Part 4, Temporary Beer Event Permit.

